en: Candy texture: Brittle; Chewy; Creamy; Crunchy; Fizzy; Fluffy; Foamy; Gritty; Gummy; Hard; Popping; Powdery; Soft; Sticky; Stretchy; Other
nb: Godteritekstur: Sprø; Seig; Kremet; Knasende; Brusende; Luftig; Skummende; Kornete; Geléaktig; Hard; Sprakende; Pulveraktig; Myk; Klebrig; Elastisk; Annet
pt-PT: Textura do doce: Quebradiço; Mastigável; Cremoso; Crocante; Efervescente; Fofo; Espumoso; Arenoso; Goma; Duro; Estaladiço; Em pó; Macio; Pegajoso; Elástico; Outro
hr-HR: Tekstura slatkiša: Krhko; Žilavo; Kremasto; Hrskavo; Pjenušavo; Pahuljasto; Pjenasto; Zrnato; Gumeno; Tvrdo; Pucketavo; U prahu; Mekano; Ljepljivo; Rastezljivo; Ostalo
ko: 캔디 식감: 브리틀; 쫄깃함; 크리미; 바삭함; 피지 (탄산); 푹신함; 거품형; 모래 같은 / 까끌까끌함; 구미; 단단함; 팝핑; 가루형; 부드러움; 끈적함; 늘어남; 기타
th: เนื้อสัมผัสแบบลูกอม: เปราะ; เคี้ยวหนึบ; เนื้อครีม; กรุบกรอบ; ซ่า; นุ่มฟู; ฟอง; เป็นเม็ด; กัมมี่; แข็ง; เป๊าะแป๊ะ; แบบผง; นุ่ม; เหนียวหนึบ; ยืดหยุ่น; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Textúra cukríkov: Krehká; Žuvacia; Krémová; Chrumkavá; Šumivá; Nadýchaná; Penová; Zrnitá; Gumená; Tvrdá; Praskajúca; Prášková; Mäkká; Lepkavá; Naťahovacia; Iné
hu: Cukorka textúrája: Törékeny; Rágós; Krémes; Ropogós; Pezsgő; Habkönnyű; Habos; Szemcsés; Gumis; Kemény; Robbanós; Poros; Puha; Ragadós; Nyúlós; Egyéb
sv: Godiskonsistens: Spröd; Seg; Krämig; Knaprig; Brusande; Fluffig; Skummig; Grynig; Geléaktig; Hård; Poppande; Pudrig; Mjuk; Klibbig; Töjbar; Övrigt
de: Textur der Süßigkeit: Brüchig; Kauweich; Cremig; Knusprig; Prickelnd; Luftig; Schaumig; Körnig; Gummiartig; Hart; Knisternd; Pulverig; Weich; Klebrig; Dehnbar; Sonstige
tr: Şekerleme dokusu: Gevrek; Çiğnenebilir; Kremamsı; Çıtır; Gazlı; Puf; Köpüklü; Tanecikli; Jölemsi; Sert; Patlayan; Toz halinde; Yumuşak; Yapışkan; Esnek; Diğer
fr: Texture du bonbon: Cassant; À mâcher; Crémeux; Croustillant; Pétillant; Aérien; Mousseux; Granuleux; Gélatineux; Dur; Crépitant; Poudreux; Mou; Collant; Élastique; Autre
ro-RO: Textură bomboană: Casantă; Masticabilă; Cremoasă; Foarte crocantă; Efervescentă; Pufoasă; Spumoasă; Granuloasă; Gumată; Tare; Trosnitoare; Pudrată; Moale; Lipicioasă; Elastică; Altele
sl-SI: Tekstura sladkarije: Krhko; Žvečljivo; Kremasto; Hrustljavo; Šumeče; Puhasto; Penasto; Zrnato; Gumijasto; Trdo; Pokajoče; Praškasto; Mehko; Lepljivo; Raztegljivo; Drugo
ja: キャンディの質感: パリパリ; チューイー; クリーミー; クランチー; フィジー; フラッフィー; フォーミー; ざらざら; グミ; ハード; パチパチ; パウダリー; ソフト; スティッキー; ストレッチー; その他
vi: Kết cấu kẹo: Giòn tan; Dẻo; Mềm mịn; Giòn; Sủi bọt; Xốp mềm; Bọt xốp; Nhiều hạt; Dai dai; Cứng; Nổ lốp bốp; Dạng bột; Mềm; Dính; Co giãn; Khác
el: Υφή καραμέλας: Εύθρυπτη; Μαστιχωτή; Κρεμώδης; Τραγανή; Ανθρακούχα; Αφράτη; Αφρώδης; Κοκκώδης; Ζελεδάτη; Σκληρή; Που σκάει (popping); Πουδρένια; Μαλακή; Κολλώδης; Ελαστική; Άλλο
fi: Karkkien koostumus: Hauras; Sitkeä; Kermainen; Rapea; Poreileva; Kuohkea; Vaahtomainen; Rakeinen; Kumimainen; Kova; Poksuva; Jauheinen; Pehmeä; Tahmea; Venytettävä; Muu
cs: Textura cukrovinek: Křehká; Žvýkací; Krémová; Křupavá; Šumivá; Nadýchaná; Pěnová; Zrnitá; Gumová; Tvrdá; Práskací; Prášková; Měkká; Lepkavá; Natahovací; Jiná
pl: Tekstura cukierka: Kruche; Ciągnące; Kremowe; Chrupiące; Musujące; Puszyste; Piankowe; Ziarenkowe; Żelkowe; Twarde; Strzelające; Pudrowe; Miękkie; Lepkie; Rozciągliwe; Inne
zh-TW: 糖果質地: 脆糖; 有嚼勁; 滑順; 酥脆; 氣泡; 蓬鬆; 泡沫; 顆粒感; 軟糖; 硬糖; 跳跳糖; 粉狀; 柔軟; 黏稠; 具延展性 / 可拉伸; 其他
nl: Snoep textuur: Broos; Chewy; Romig; Krokant; Bruisend; Luchtig; Schuimig; Korrelig; Gummy; Hard; Knetterend; Poederachtig; Zacht; Plakkerig; Rekbaar; Overig
es: Textura del dulce: Quebradizo; Masticable; Cremoso; Crujiente; Efervescente; Esponjoso; Espumoso; Arenoso; Gomoso; Duro; Explosivo; En polvo; Blando; Pegajoso; Elástico; Otro
da: Sliktekstur: Sprød (krokant); Sej; Cremet; Knasende; Brusende; Luftig; Skummende; Grynet; Vingummi; Hård; Poppende; Pulveragtig; Blød; Klistret; Strækbar; Andet
ru: Текстура конфет: Ломкая; Жевательная; Кремовая; Хрустящая; Шипучая; Воздушная; Пенистая; Зернистая; Мармеладная; Твердая; Взрывная; Порошкообразная; Мягкая; Липкая; Тягучая; Другое
pt-BR: Textura da bala: Quebradiço; Mastigável; Cremoso; Crocante; Efervescente; Fofo; Espumoso; Arenoso; Goma; Duro; Estalante; Em pó; Macio; Pegajoso; Elástico; Outro
zh-CN: 糖果质地: 酥脆; 有嚼劲; 柔滑; 嘎嘣脆; 起泡; 蓬松; 泡沫状; 颗粒感; Q弹; 坚硬; 爆裂口感; 粉状; 柔软; 黏糊; 拉丝; 其他
lt-LT: Saldainio tekstūra: Trapūs; Kramtomi; Kreminiai; Traškūs; Šnypščiantys; Purūs; Putos pavidalo; Grūdėti; Guminukai; Kieti; Spirginantys; Miltelių pavidalo; Minkšti; Lipnūs; Tamprūs; Kita
bg-BG: Текстура на бонбоните: Твърди и чупливи; Дъвчащи; Кремообразни; Хрупкави; Шупващи; Пухкави; Пенести; Песъчливи (Gritty); Желирани; Твърди; Пукащи; Прахообразни; Меки; Лепкави; Разтегливи; Други
it: consistenza caramellata: Friabile; Masticabile; Cremoso; Croccante; Frizzante; Soffice; Schiumoso; Granuloso; Gommoso; Duro; Scoppiettante; Polveroso; Morbido; Appiccicoso; Elastico; Altro